Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1038
Emergency services, defined.

Emergency services means the provision through a public safety agency of firefighting, law enforcement, ambulance, emergency, medical, or other public emergency services, as determined by a local governing body, to respond to and manage emergency incidents.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 7;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1007;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 20.